Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 85. West Kentucky Development

154.85-001.
Short title for KRS 154.85-001 to 154.85-085. [Repealed.]

154.85-010.
Definitions for KRS 154.85-001 to 154.85-085. [Repealed.]

154.85-015.
Creation of West Kentucky Corporation — Purpose — Interim board of directors. [Repealed.]

154.85-020.
Eligibility for membership on board of directors and in corporation. [Repealed.]

154.85-025.
Board of directors — Terms of office — Vacancies. [Repealed.]

154.85-027.
Removal of members — Meetings — Officers. [Repealed.]

154.85-030.
Disclosure of conflict of interest — Nonparticipation in contract authorization. [Repealed.]

154.85-033.
Limitation of liability of corporate members or officers. [Repealed.]

154.85-035.
Powers and authority of corporation. [Repealed.]

154.85-040.
Executive committee — Membership — Powers and duties — Meetings — Expenses. [Repealed.]

154.85-045.
Issuance of bonds. [Repealed.]

154.85-050.
West Kentucky economic development fund. [Repealed.]

154.85-055.
Construction of KRS 154.85-001 to 154.85-085. [Repealed.]

154.85-060.
Bonds payable from revenues and assets only. [Repealed.]

154.85-065.
Negotiability of obligations of corporation. [Repealed.]

154.85-070.
Status of obligations as authorized investments. [Repealed.]

154.85-075.
Tax-exempt status. [Repealed.]

154.85-080.
Disposition of corporation assets upon termination or dissolution. [Repealed.]

154.85-085.
Annual report — Annual audit. [Repealed.]